Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 17 Franchises

39-17-1.
Power of town or city to grant franchises.

Any town or city, by vote of the town council or city council, may pass ordinances or make contracts to be executed by its proper officers, granting rights and franchises in, over, or under the streets and highways in the town or city to the corporations, as are provided for in §

39-17-2

, and for the purposes and upon the condition specified in this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-1

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 119.

39-17-2.
Purposes for which permitted — Duration — Protection of existing businesses — Landowner’s rights.

Any grants, whether by ordinance or by contract, may confer upon any corporation created by the general assembly for the purpose of distributing water, or for the purpose of producing, selling, and distributing currents of electricity to be used for light, heat, or motive power, or for the purpose of manufacturing, selling, and distributing illuminating or heating gas, or for the purpose of operating street railways by any motive power, or for the purpose of operating telephones, the exclusive right, for a time not exceeding twenty-five (25) years, to erect, lay, construct, and maintain for the purposes for which the corporation is created, poles, wires, pipes, conduits, rails, or cables, with necessary and convenient appurtenances as may be required for the conduct of the business of the corporation, in, over, or under the streets of the town or city; provided, however, that no grant of exclusive rights or franchises for any of the purposes described in this section shall be made by any city or town where, at the time a corporation created for the same purpose, or a person duly authorized by law to use the streets for such purpose, shall be in actual use and enjoyment of the rights, except to the corporation or person already carrying on business in the city or town; and provided, further, that whenever in any city or town more than one corporation shall at the time be in actual use and enjoyment of portions of the streets and highways for any of the purposes described in this section, no exclusive right or franchise shall be granted to either without the consent of the other; and provided, further, that no grant shall prevent any town or city from permitting any person or corporation to use streets or highways for any of the purposes described in this section in order to connect and serve any two (2) or more estates owned by the person or corporation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-2

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 119; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 15.

39-17-3.
Franchise tax payable to city or town.

Every corporation that shall accept exclusive rights or franchises granted by ordinance or contract under the provisions of this chapter, shall make and render to the treasurer of the town or city granting the same, on or before the thirtieth day of January, April, July, and October in every year, returns, verified by the oath of its president or treasurer, of the gross earnings of the corporation within the town or city for the period of three (3) months next preceding the first day of January, April, July, and October in the same year, and shall at the time pay to the town or city treasurer, in full payment for the rights and franchises granted under this chapter, a special tax upon the gross earnings at a rate not exceeding three percent (3%) upon the gross earnings of the corporation within the town or city in that year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 119.

39-17-4.
Apportionment of gross earnings among cities and towns.

In case any corporation shall do business in more than one town or city, and it shall be unable to ascertain the amount of its gross earnings in each town or city separately from actual accounts kept thereof, its returns of gross earnings to be made as provided in §

39-17-3

shall state the gross earnings of its entire business and the length of its wires, pipes, mains, or tracks in the streets and highways of each town or city, and the gross earnings from its business in the town or city shall be taken to be that proportion of the whole gross earnings that the length of its wires, pipes, mains, or tracks in the streets and highways of the city or town bears to the total length of all its wires, pipes, mains, or tracks in streets and highways.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 119.

39-17-5.
Delinquencies in franchise tax.

In case any corporation shall neglect to make payment of the quarterly tax as provided in §

39-17-3

, the town or city treasurer may collect and recover of the corporation, as other taxes are collectible, double the amount of the special tax shown to be due by the last preceding quarterly return of the corporation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-5

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 119.

39-17-6.
Rate increases during term of franchise.

No corporation which shall acquire exclusive rights or franchises under the provisions of this chapter, shall at any time during the continuance thereof charge for its product, wares, or service, to any town or city or the inhabitants thereof, any greater price than the price actually charged by it at the time of the granting of the rights or franchises, both prices being reckoned in United States gold coin of the standard weight and fineness in force at the time of the granting of the right or franchise, or in the equivalent thereof in actual value in other lawful money of the United States.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-6

.

39-17-7.
Town regulatory powers — Appeal.

The use and enjoyment of all rights and franchises granted under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to such reasonable rules and regulations and orders, controlling the extent and quality of construction and service to be maintained by the corporation to which such rights are granted, and prescribing the location and arrangement of its tracks, poles, wires, or conduits, and their appurtenances, as are, or may be from time to time, enacted by the town or city councils. In case any regulation or enactment shall seem to any corporation to be unreasonable, the corporation, within thirty (30) days after the same has been passed, may complain to the division of public utilities and carriers setting forth that the regulation or order is not reasonable in the premises; and thereupon the division shall proceed to hear and determine the matter in accordance with the provisions of chapter 4 of this title; subject, however, to the right of appeal to the superior court contained in chapter 5 of this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, § 1107; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 5; P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 52; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-7

.

39-17-8.
Charges for use of streets.

No city or town shall make any charge to any corporation for the use of its streets except under and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; provided, that any city or town may require that any street railway company shall continue to conform to any existing requirements as to paving and keeping in repair the streets and highways.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 77, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 91, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 103, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 126, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-17-8

.